Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2617
Health and Human Services Reimbursement Fund; created; purpose.

There is hereby created in the Department of Health and Human Services a cash fund to be known as the Health and Human Services Reimbursement Fund. Any money in the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure Reimbursement Fund on July 1, 2007, shall be transferred to the Health and Human Services Reimbursement Fund. The fund shall be used for payment of services performed for the department for inspection and licensing of hospitals and nursing homes under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1971, LB 224, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 634;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 551.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.